North Carolina statutes. Chapter 35A. Incompetency and Guardianship.
Article 20. Guardians’ Deeds Validated When Seal Omitted.

§ 35A-1360.
Deeds by guardians omitting seal, prior to January 1, 1944, validated.

All deeds executed prior to the first day of January, 1944, by any guardian, acting under authority obtained by him from the superior court as required by law, in which the guardian has omitted to affix his seal after his signature and/or has omitted to affix the seal after the signature of his ward shall be good and valid, and shall pass the title to the land which the guardian was authorized to convey: Provided, however, this section shall not apply to any pending litigation.

History.

1947, c. 531; 1987, c. 550, s. 9.

§ 35A-1361.
Certain private sales validated.

All private sales of real and personal property made by a guardian under Article 4 of this Chapter before June 1, 1985, that, under

G.S. 1-339.36

, should have been conducted as public sales because an upset bid was submitted, are validated to the same extent as if the guardian had complied with the procedures for a public sale.

History.

1985, c. 654, s. 1(2); 1987, c. 550, s. 9.

§§ 35A-1362 through 35A-1369.

Reserved for future codification purposes.